Nebraska, session 109, LB848.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB848 LB848
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-2701, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2701 Sections 77-2701 to 77-27,135.01, 77-27,222, 77-27,235,
77-27,236, and 77-27,238 to 77-27,242 and section 3 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.
Sec. 2. Section 77-2701.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2701.04 For purposes of sections 77-2701.04 to 77-2713 and
77-27,239 and section 3 of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the definitions found in sections 77-2701.05 to 77-2701.56
shall be used.
Sec. 3. (1)(a) The following items are exempted from state and
local sales and use taxes during a three-day period beginning at 12:01
a.m. on the first Friday in August and ending at midnight on the Sunday
following:
(i) All retail sales of any article of clothing having a taxable
value of one hundred dollars or less;
(ii) All retail sales of school supplies not to exceed fifty dollars
per purchase;
(iii) All computer software with a taxable value of three hundred
fifty dollars or less;
(iv) All graphing calculators having a taxable value of one hundred
fifty dollars or less; and
(v) All retail sales of personal computers or computer peripheral
devices not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars.
(b) This section applies to sales of items bought for personal use
only.
(c) Items that are normally sold as a single unit shall continue to
be sold in that manner and shall not be priced separately and sold as
individual items.
(d) The exemption of a bundled transaction shall be calculated as
-2-

LB848 LB848
2026 2026
provided by law for all other bundled transactions.
(e) If a purchaser and seller are located in two different time
zones, the time zone of the purchaser's location shall determine the
authorized exemption period.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Clothing means any article of wearing apparel intended to be
worn on or about the human body including, but not limited to, disposable
diapers for infants or adults and footwear. The term shall include, but
not be limited to, cloth and other material used to make school uniforms
or other school clothing. Items normally sold in pairs shall not be
separated to qualify for the exemption. The term shall not include
watches, watchbands, jewelry, handbags, handkerchiefs, umbrellas,
scarves, ties, headbands, or belt buckles;
(b) Personal computers means a laptop, desktop, or tower computer
system which consists of a central processing unit, random access memory,
a storage drive, a display monitor, and a keyboard and devices designed
for use in conjunction with a personal computer, such as a disk drive,
memory module, compact disk drive, daughterboard, digitizer, microphone,
modem, motherboard, mouse, multimedia speaker, printer, scanner, single-
user hardware, single-user operating system, soundcard, or video card;
and
(c) School supplies means any item normally used by students in a
standard classroom for educational purposes, including but not limited
to, textbooks, notebooks, paper, writing instruments, crayons, art
supplies, rulers, book bags, backpacks, handheld calculators, chalk,
maps, and globes. The term shall not include watches, radios, CD players,
headphones, sporting equipment, portable or desktop telephones, copiers
or other office equipment, furniture, or fixtures. School supplies shall
also include computer software having a taxable value of three hundred
fifty dollars or less and any graphing calculator having a taxable value
of one hundred fifty dollars or less.
-3-

LB848 LB848
2026 2026
(3) A sale of property that is eligible for an exemption under
subsection (1) of this section but is purchased under a layaway sale
shall only qualify for an exemption if:
(a) Final payment on a layaway order is made by, and the property is
given to, the purchaser during the exemption period; or
(b) The purchaser selects the property and the seller accepts the
order for the property during the exemption period, for immediate
delivery upon full payment, even if delivery is made after the exemption
period.
(4)(a) For any discount offered by a seller that is a reduction of
the sales price of the product, the discounted sales price shall
determine whether the sales price falls below the price thresholds
provided in subsection (1) of this section. A coupon that reduces the
sales price shall be treated as a discount only if the seller is not
reimbursed for the coupon amount by a third party.
(b) If a discount applies to the total amount paid by a purchaser
rather than to the sales price of a particular product and the purchaser
has purchased both exempt property and taxable property, the seller shall
allocate the discount based on the total sales prices of the taxable
property compared to the total sales prices of all property sold in the
same transaction.
(5) Items that are purchased during an exemption period but that are
not delivered to the purchaser until after the exemption period due to
the item not being in stock shall qualify for an exemption. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply to an item that was
delivered during an exemption period but was purchased prior to or after
the exemption period.
(6)(a) If a purchaser purchases an item of eligible property during
an exemption period but later exchanges the item for a similar eligible
item after the exemption period, no additional tax shall be due on the
new item.
-4-

LB848 LB848
2026 2026
(b) If a purchaser purchases an item of eligible property during an
exemption period but later returns the item after the exemption period
and receives credit on the purchase of a different nonexempt item, the
appropriate sales tax shall be due on the sale of the newly purchased
item.
(c) If a purchaser purchases an item of eligible property before an
exemption period but during the exemption period returns the item and
receives credit on the purchase of a different item of eligible property,
no sales tax shall be due on the sale of the new item if the new item is
purchased during the exemption period.
(d) For a sixty-day period immediately following the end of the
exemption period, if a purchaser returns an exempt item, no credit for or
refund of sales tax shall be given unless the purchaser provides a
receipt or invoice that shows tax was paid or the seller has sufficient
documentation to show that tax was paid on the item being returned.
Sec. 4. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 5. Original sections 77-2701 and 77-2701.04, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-5-